Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-432
Confinement; execution.

Under such instructions as the Governor may prescribe, a sentence of confinement adjudged by a court-martial or other military tribunal, whether or not the sentence includes discharge or dismissal, and whether or not the discharge or dismissal has been executed, may be carried into execution by confinement in any place of confinement as provided in section 55-413. Persons so confined in a penal or correctional institution not under the control of one of the military forces are subject to the same discipline and treatment as persons confined or committed by the courts of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 32, p. 1568.